Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB50.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definitions of "authority" and "city" in section 301 of the act of April 14, 2006 (P.L.85, No.28), known as the Water Services Act, are amended to read:Section 301. Definitions.1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526 The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Authority." A body politic and corporate which meets all of the following:(1) Is established by a city and incorporated under any of the following:(i) The former act of June 28, 1935 (P.L.463, No.191), entitled, "An act providing, for a limited period of time, for the incorporation, as bodies corporate and politic, of 'Authorities' for municipalities; defining the same; prescribing the rights, powers, and duties of such Authorities; authorizing such Authorities to acquire, construct, improve, maintain, and operate projects, and to borrow money and issue bonds therefor; providing for the payment of such bonds, and prescribing the rights of the holders thereof; conferring the right of eminent domain on such Authorities; authorizing such Authorities to enter into contracts with and to accept grants from the Federal Government or any agency thereof; and for other purposes."(ii) The former act of May 2, 1945 (P.L.382, No.164), known as the Municipality Authorities Act of 1945.(iii) 53 Pa.C.S. Ch. 56 (relating to municipal authorities).(2) Provides water [and] or sewer services in accordance with all of the following:(i) The water or sewer services, or both, are 20250HB0050PN0040 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 provided, either by an agreement with a municipality or directly, to users who are residents of one or more municipalities outside the boundaries of the city.(ii) The total number of residents of municipalities which are outside the boundaries of the city and in which water or sewer services, or both, are offered or provided exceeds by at least 50% the number of residents who reside within the boundaries of the city.(3) Owns:(i) a sewer, sewer system or parts of a sewer or sewer system or sewage treatment works; [and] or(ii) a waterworks, water supply works or water distribution system."City." A city of the third class, including a city of the third class which has adopted a home rule charter [and has a population of not more than 30,000].* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0050PN0040 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718